src/scripts/Brazilian-Portuguese/gpos.foma
# Copyright (C) 2019  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define DefiniteArticle 
o | a | os | as ; 

define IndefiniteArticle 
um | uma | uns | umas ; 

define PersonalPronoun 
eu | tu | você | ele | ela | nós | vós | vocês | eles | elas ; 

define PersonalReflexivePronoun 
me | te | nos | vos | la | lo | las | los | se ; 

define DemonstrativePronoun 
este | esta | estes | estas | neste | nesta | nestes | nestas | deste | desta | destes | destas | esse | essa | esses | essas | desse | dessa | desses | dessas | nesse | nessa | nesses | nessas | aquele | aquela | aqueles | aquelas | daquele | daquela | daqueles | daquelas | naquele | naquela | naqueles | naquelas | que ; 

define PossessiveAdjective 
meu | minha | meus | minhas | teu | tua | teus | tuas | seu | sua | seus | suas | nosso | nossa | nossos | nossas | vosso | vossa | vossos | vossas | dele | dela | deles | delas | nele | nela | neles | nelas ; 

define Preposition 
de | do | da | dos | das | dum | duma | duns | dumas | em | no | na | nos | nas | num | numa | nuns | numas | por | pelo | pela | pelos | pelas | ao | à | aos | às | para | pro | pra | pros | pras | com | sem | até | desde | entre | sobre | sob ; 

define UnstressedConjunction 
e | ou | se | mas | como ; 

define Conjunction 
porém | todavia | contudo | assim | portanto | porque | pois | embora | apesar | caso | apenas | enquanto ; 

define Ser 
ser | sou | és | é | somos | sois | são | era | eras | éramos | éreis | eram | fui | foste | foi | fomos | fostes | foram | serei | serás | será | seremos | sereis | serão | seria | serias | seríamos | seríeis | seriam ;

define Estar 
estar | estou | estás | está | estamos | estais | estão | estava | estavas | estávamos | estão | estive | esteve | estivemos | estiveram | estarei | estarás | estará | estaremos | estarão ; 

define Ter 
ter | tenho | tens | tem | temos | tendes | têm | tinha | tinhas | tínhamos | tínheis | tinham | tive | tiveste | teve | tivemos | tivestes | tiveram | terei | terás | terá | teremos | tereis | terão | teria | terias | teríamos | teriam ; 

define Fazer 
fazer | faço | faz | fazemos | fazem ; 

define Poder 
poder | posso | podes | pode | podemos | podeis | podem | podia | podias | podíamos | podíeis | podiam | pude | pôde | pudemos | puderam | poderei | poderás | poderá | poderemos | podereis | poderão | poderia | poderias | poderíamos | poderiam ; 

define Ir 
ir | vou | vais | vai | vamos | vão | ia | ias | íamos | iam | irei | irás | irá | iremos | irão ; 

define Haver 
haver | há | hei | havemos | hão | havia | haviam | havíamos | haverei | haverá | haverás | haveremos | haverão | haveria | haveríamos | haveriam ; 

define AuxiliaryVerb 
Ser | Estar | Ter | Haver ; 

define WhWord 
que | quem | quens | quando | onde | aonde | quanto | quanta | quantos | quantas | quão | qual | quais | como ; 

define FunctionWord 
DefiniteArticle | 
IndefiniteArticle | 
PersonalPronoun | 
PersonalReflexivePronoun | 
DemonstrativePronoun | 
PossessiveAdjective | 
Preposition | 
UnstressedConjunction | 
Conjunction | 
AuxiliaryVerb | 
WhWord ; 

regex 
DefiniteArticle -> def ,, 
IndefiniteArticle -> indef ,, 
PersonalPronoun -> pp ,, 
PersonalReflexivePronoun -> prp ,, 
[DemonstrativePronoun -que] -> dp ,, 
PossessiveAdjective -> pos ,, 
[Preposition -nos] -> prep ,, 
[UnstressedConjunction - [se|como]] -> uconj ,, 
Conjunction -> conj ,, 
Ser -> cop ,, 
Estar -> cop ,, 
Ter -> aux ,, 
Haver -> aux ,, 
WhWord -> whw ,, 
\FunctionWord -> content ; 
